Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 27 Habeas Corpus
§ 1-27-128.
Petitioner may be committed or admitted to bail.

The petitioner may be
committed, let to bail or his bail be mitigated or increased as justice
requires.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 37; R.S. 1887, § 1302; R.S. 1899, § 5501; C.S. 1910, § 6363; C.S. 1920, § 7659; R.S. 1931, § 51-138; C.S. 1945, § 3-6538; W.S. 1957, § 1-847; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-128.

Cross references. —

As to bail, see Rule 3.1, W.R. Cr. P.

§ 1-27-129.
Custody of petitioner pendente lite.

Until the sufficiency
of the cause of restraint is determined, the defendant may retain
the petitioner in his custody.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 38; R.S. 1887, § 1303; R.S. 1899, § 5502; C.S. 1910, § 6364; C.S. 1920, § 7660; R.S. 1931, § 51-139; C.S. 1945, § 3-6539; W.S. 1957, § 1-848; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-129.

Cross references. —

As to order to bring plaintiff promptly before the court or judge, see §

1-27-115

.

§ 1-27-130.
Presence of petitioner at trial; waiver.

The petitioner or his
attorney may waive in writing his right to be present at the trial,
in which case the proceedings may be had in his absence. The writ
in such cases will be modified accordingly.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 39; R.S. 1887, § 1304; R.S. 1899, § 5503; C.S. 1910, § 6365; C.S. 1920, § 7661; R.S. 1931, § 51-140; C.S. 1945, § 3-6540; W.S. 1957, § 1-849; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-130.

§ 1-27-131.
Refusal of officer to deliver copy of process.

Any officer refusing
to deliver a copy of any legal process by which he detains the petitioner
in custody to any person who demands a copy, shall forfeit five hundred
dollars ($500.00) to the person detained.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 42; R.S. 1887, § 1307; R.S. 1899, § 5506; C.S. 1910, § 6368; C.S. 1920, § 7664; R.S. 1931, § 51-143; C.S. 1945, § 3-6543; W.S. 1957, § 1-852; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-131.

§ 1-27-132.
Transfer, removal or concealment of person with intent to avoid service.

Whoever, having under
his restraint any person for whose release a writ of habeas corpus
has been issued or is being applied for, transfers that person to
the custody or control of another or conceals the place of his confinement
or restraint, or removes him from the jurisdiction of the court from
which the writ is issued or sought, with the intent to avoid the service
or effect of the writ, or whoever knowingly aids or abets in the commission
of any such offense, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) or imprisoned not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 119; R.S. 1899, § 5085; C.S. 1910, § 5936; C.S. 1920, § 7225; R.S. 1931, § 32-616; C.S. 1945, § 9-625; W.S. 1957, § 1-853; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-132.

§ 1-27-133.
Papers to be filed; journal entry.

When the proceedings
are before a judge and the writ is allowed, all papers in the case
shall be filed with the clerk of the district court of the county
wherein the final proceedings are had, and the final order shall be
entered by the clerk upon the journal as a vacation order.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 43; Laws 1882, ch. 23, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1308; R.S. 1899, § 5507; C.S. 1910, § 6369; C.S. 1920, § 7665; R.S. 1931, § 51-144; C.S. 1945, § 3-6544; W.S. 1957, § 1-854; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-133.

§ 1-27-134.
Fees and costs not to be advanced.

No officer shall refuse
to perform any of the duties required by law in habeas corpus proceedings
because his fees are not paid in advance, but the judge or court to
whom a petition is made may require the petitioner to give security
for the payment of costs that may be taxed against him.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 44; R.S. 1887, § 1309; R.S. 1899, § 5508; C.S. 1910, § 6370; C.S. 1920, § 7666; R.S. 1931, § 51-145; C.S. 1945, § 3-6545; W.S. 1957, § 1-855; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-134.

Cross references. —

As to costs and security therefor, see chapter 14 of this title.